Hawaii statutes.
§634-31 Same; nonresidents; service.
The transaction of any acts, business, or activities within the State by any
officer, agent, representative, employee, or member of any such association
having officers, agents, members, or property without the State, on behalf of
such association, or any of its members or affiliated local associations, shall
subject the association and its members to the jurisdiction of the courts of
this State in any action or proceeding against or involving the association
growing out of the acts, business, or activities within the State giving rise
to any cause of action, and the acts, business, or activities shall be a
signification of the agreement of the association and its members that any
legal process or notice in any action, matter, or proceeding against or
involving it, which is served shall be of the same legal force and validity as
if served upon the association and its members personally. Service of such
process or notice shall be made by registered mail to the association at its
last known address and an affidavit of compliance with this section shall be
filed with the court or other state agency or department before which the
action, matter, or proceeding is pending. The filing shall be deemed service
upon the association and its members twenty days after the filing. [L Sp 1949,
c 4, §2; RL 1955, §230-40; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §15; am L 1963, c 114, §3; HRS
§634-67; am L 1972, c 89, §2A(k); ren HRS §634-31; am L 1983, c 153, §4; am L
1984, c 209, §1]

Cross References

Use of certified mail, see §1-28.

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 4.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next